Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-503 Modification or impairment of
rights and remedies. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this article,
the lease agreement may include rights and remedies for default in addition to
or in substitution for those provided in this article and may limit or alter
the measure of damages recoverable under this article.

(b) Resort to a remedy provided under this article
or in the lease agreement is optional unless the remedy is expressly agreed to
be exclusive. If circumstances cause an exclusive or limited remedy to fail of
its essential purpose, or provision for an exclusive remedy is unconscionable,
remedy may be had as provided in this article.

(c) Consequential damages may be liquidated
under section 490:2A-504, or may otherwise be limited, altered, or excluded
unless the limitation, alteration, or exclusion is unconscionable. Limitation,
alteration, or exclusion of consequential damages for injury to the person in
the case of consumer goods is prima facie unconscionable but limitation, alteration,
or exclusion of damages where the loss is commercial is not prima facie
unconscionable.

(d) Rights and remedies on default by the
lessor or the lessee with respect to any obligation or promise collateral or
ancillary to the lease contract are not impaired by this article. [L 1991, c
40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next